Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0660.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 23. (1) For the purpose of defraying all or part of its project costs, refunding or refunding in advance obligations authorized under this act or obligations authorized under the industrial development revenue bond act of 1963, 1963 PA 62, MCL 125.1251 to 125.1267, by a municipality incorporating a corporation under this act, a corporation may borrow money and issue its revenue bonds or revenue notes. Refunding bonds may be issued by the corporation whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, are or are not redeemable on the date of issuance of the refunding bonds, or are or are not subject to redemption before maturity. , and Refunding bonds may be issued to pay principal, interest, redemption premiums, or any combination thereof of principal, interest, and redemption premiums of the obligations to be refunded. The bonds may be issued partly to refund bonds and partly for any other purpose authorized by this act. The refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount greater than the principal amount of the bonds to be refunded as may be necessary to effect the refunding pursuant to the plan of refunding. The bonds or notes shall be are exempt from all taxation except inheritance and transfer taxes, and the interest on the bonds or notes shall be is exempt from all taxation in the this state, of Michigan, notwithstanding that the interest may be subject to federal income tax. (2) The municipality shall is not be liable on notes or bonds of the corporation, and the notes and bonds shall are not be a debt of the municipality. The notes and bonds shall must contain on their face a statement to that effect. (3) The bonds and notes of the corporation may be invested in by all public officers, state agencies and political subdivisions, insurance companies, banks, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and fiduciaries and trustees, and may be deposited with and received by all public officers and the agencies and political subdivisions of this state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds is authorized. (4) The corporation shall report to the governing body of the municipality for which the corporation is incorporated and the Michigan economic development corporation bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act not less than once per year, which report shall must fully describe the activities of the corporation including a statement of all revenues and expenditures since the previous report. (5) The financial records, accountings, audit reports, and other reports of public money under the control of the corporation shall be are public records and must be open to inspection. The corporation shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the incorporating municipality not more than 120 days after the conclusion of the corporation's operating year a statement of all of its revenues and expenditures for the year and shall distribute copies of the report upon on request. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.